Utah statutes.
26-8a-106.   Waiver of rules.
(1)  Upon application, the committee or department may waive the requirements
of a rule it has adopted if:
(a)  the person applying for the waiver satisfactorily demonstrates that:
(i)  the waiver is necessary for a pilot project to be undertaken by the
applicant;
(ii)  in the particular situation, the requirement serves no beneficial public
purpose; or
(iii)  circumstances warrant that waiver of the requirement outweighs the
public benefit to be gained by adherence to the rule; and
(b)  for a waiver granted under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) or (iii), the committee
or department:
(i)  extends the waiver to similarly situated persons upon application; or
(ii)  amends the rule to be consistent with the waiver.
(2)  No waiver may be granted under this section that is inconsistent with the
provisions of this chapter.
